Maryland, session 2025, HB1160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1160*

HOUSE BILL 1160
Article – Tax – Property
7–402.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN CALVERT COUNTY.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION,
PERSONAL PROPERTY IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE COUNTY PROPERTY TAX.
(C) THE FOLLOWING PERSONAL PROPERTY IS SUBJECT TO THE COUNTY
PROPERTY TAX:
(1) OPERATING PERSONAL PROPERTY OF A RAILROAD OR A PUBLIC
UTILITY;
(2) PROPERTY USED TO PROVIDE A CABLE TELEVISION, DATA, OR
TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE, INCLUDING:
(I) ALL FIBER–OPTIC AND OTHER CABLE WIRE SYSTEMS;
(II) CELLULAR TELEPHONE TOWERS; AND
(III) WIRELESS APPURTENANCES ATTACHED TO OR INSTALLED
ON CELLULAR TELEPHONE TOWERS; AND
(3) ELECTRONIC INSTANT BINGO MACHINES AUTHORIZED TO BE
OPERATED UNDER § 12–308 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(D) PERSONAL PROPERTY THAT IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH A PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES AGREEMENT IS SUBJECT TO THE
COUNTY PROPERTY TAX ON THE TERMINATION OF THE AGREEMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act shall take effect contingent on the governing body of
Calvert County entering into a payment in lieu of taxes agreement with the owner of a
qualified data center, as defined under § 11–239 of the Tax – General Article.
(b) Within 5 days after entering into the payment in lieu of taxes agreement
described under subsection (a) of this section, the governing body of Calvert County shall
forward a copy of the agreement to the Department of Legislative Services.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:

HOUSE BILL 1160 3
(a) Section 1 of this Act shall take effect on the date that the notice provided in
accordance with Section 2(b) of this Act is received by the Department of Legislative
Services, and shall be applicable to:
(1) if the date on which the notice is received is before June 1 of the
calendar year, all taxable years beginning after June 30 of that calendar year; or
(2) if the date on which the notice is received is on or after June 1 of the
calendar year, all taxable years beginning after June 30 of the following calendar year.
(b) If notice of the payment in lieu of taxes agreement is not received by the
Department of Legislative Services on or before June 30, 2030, Section 1 of this Act, with
no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 3 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.